Illinois, session 104th, SB858.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Highway Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-101 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 5/1-101)  (from Ch. 121, par. 1-101)7    Sec. 1-101. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the Illinois Highway Code.9(Source: Laws 1959, p. 196.)